Maryland, session 2025, SB0669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–926.1.
(b) (2) A law enforcement agency or a person, including a health care provider,
forensic laboratory, or State’s Attorney, that had control or possession of a sexual assault
evidence collection kit before October 1, 2023, and has control or possession of the sexual
assault evidence collection kit on or after October 1, 2023, shall report location, status, and
chain of custody information to the reporting program established under this section on or
before [December 31, 2025] MARCH 31, 2026.
Article – Public Safety
4–401.
– 1 –

Ch. 667 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Forensic laboratory” means a facility, an entity, or a site that offers or
performs forensic analysis and is owned or operated by the State, a county or municipal
corporation in the State, or another governmental entity.
(3) “Fund” means the Rape Kit Testing Grant Fund.
(4) “Law enforcement agency” means the Department of State Police or a
police department of a county or municipal corporation in the State.
(b) There is a Rape Kit Testing Grant Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to PROVIDE FUNDING TO:
(1) provide law enforcement agencies with funding to pay for testing of
sexual assault evidence collection kits by forensic laboratories, INCLUDING EQUIPMENT,
SUPPLIES, PERSONNEL, AND OUTSOURCING;
(2) PROVIDE THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WITH
FUNDING TO ASSIST LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY INVESTIGATIONS OF CRIMES
INVOLVING SEXUAL ASSAULT EVIDENCE COLLECTION KITS THAT WERE COLLECTED
BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2020, AND HAVE NOT BEEN TESTED;
(3) PROVIDE THE FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED STATE SEXUAL ASSAULT
COALITION WITH FUNDING FOR A STATEWIDE SEXUAL ASSAULT VICTIM
NOTIFICATION HOTLINE AND RELATED PERSONNEL TO PROVIDE VICTIMS OF
SEXUAL ASSAULT WITH:
(I) ADVOCACY;
(II) SUPPORT;
(III) INFORMATION ABOUT UNTESTED RAPE KITS;
(IV) INFORMATION ABOUT NAVIGATING THE SEXUAL ASSAULT
EVIDENCE KIT TRACKING SYSTEM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–926.1 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; AND
(V) VICTIMS’ RIGHTS INFORMATION; AND
(4) PROVIDE SUPPORT TO PEER–TO–PEER TELEHEALTH PROGRAMS
AS DEFINED IN § 11–1007 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 667
(d) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and
Policy shall:
(1) administer the Fund;
(2) establish and publish procedures for the distribution of funding to law
enforcement agencies;
(3) ensure each jurisdiction in the State that has a forensic laboratory is
able to access the Fund;
(4) consider the number of sexual assault incidents that were investigated
by a law enforcement agency in the prior fiscal year when distributing funding; [and]
(5) (I) ENSURE THAT FUNDS ARE DISTRIBUTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (C)(2) AND (3) OF THIS SECTION EACH FISCAL YEAR UNTIL ALL
SEXUAL ASSAULT EVIDENCE COLLECTION KITS COLLECTED BEFORE OCTOBER 1,
2020, HAVE BEEN TESTED, OR IT HAS BEEN DETERMINED THAT TESTING IS NOT
REQUIRED UNDER § 11–926 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; AND
(II) UNLESS THE APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IS REDUCED OR
FUNDING HAS BEEN AWARDED FROM THE NATIONAL SEXUAL ASSAULT KIT
INITIATIVE FOR THE SAME PURPOSE, ENSURE THAT FUNDS DISTRIBUTED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH ARE NOT LESS THAN THE AMOUNT DISTRIBUTED FOR THE PRIOR
FISCAL YEAR; AND
(6) submit a report with information on the distribution of funding to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, before
September 1 each year.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) any interest earnings of the Fund; and
(3) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
– 3 –

Ch. 667 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(g) (1) The Fund may be used only for [equipment, supplies, personnel, and
outsourcing necessary for the testing of sexual assault evidence collection kits in forensic
laboratories] THE PURPOSES STATED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Fund may be used for
equipment, supplies, personnel, and outsourcing necessary for the testing of sexual assault
evidence collection kits collected before or after the establishment of the Fund.
(3) THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED TO SUPPORT THE SEXUAL ASSAULT
EVIDENCE COLLECTION KIT TRACKING SYSTEM PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
11–926.1 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund, including interest earnings under
subsection (f) of this section, shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) (1) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF
CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY MAY MAKE A GRANT FROM THE FUND FOR A
PERIOD OF UP TO 36 MONTHS.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for testing of sexual assault evidence
collection kits is supplemental to and is not intended to take the place of funding that
otherwise would be appropriated for [testing of sexual assault evidence collection kits] THE
PURPOSES OF THE FUND AS STATED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –